Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 11. Nominations.
§ 23-15-319.
Applicability of chapter to municipal primary elections.

All the provisions of this subarticle as far as practicable shall apply to and regulate primary elections for the nomination of elective municipal offices. Candidates for the nomination of such municipal offices shall file with the clerk of the city, village or town, the affidavits and reports required of candidates for party nominations to any county or county district office to be filed pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-71 [Codes, 1942, § 3195; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1944, ch. 210; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 101, eff from and after January 1, 1987.